apertium-sme-fin.fin.lexc
LEXICON kotus_32_NOUN/stemfiller
0:{AV-}	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:{AV+}e	NounAllomorph/IllativeVN	;
0:{AV+}e	NounStem/Singular	;
0:{AV-}	NounAllomorph/PartitiveTA	;
0:{AV-}	NounAllomorph/GenitiveTEN	;
0:{AV+}	NounAllomorph/PartitiveIA	;
0:{AV+}	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIEN	;
0:{AV+}	NounAllomorph/IllativeIIN	;
0:{AV+}	NounStem/Plural	;

LEXICON kotus_33_NOUN/stemfiller
0:{AV-}n	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:{AV+}me	NounAllomorph/IllativeVN	;
0:{AV+}me	NounStem/Singular	;
0:{AV-}n	NounAllomorph/PartitiveTA	;
0:{AV-}n	NounAllomorph/GenitiveTEN	;
0:{AV+}m	NounAllomorph/PartitiveIA	;
0:{AV+}m	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIEN	;
0:{AV+}m	NounAllomorph/IllativeIIN	;
0:{AV+}m	NounStem/Plural	;

LEXICON kotus_34_NOUN/stemfiller
0:{AV-}n	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:{AV+}m{aä}	NounAllomorph/IllativeVN	;
0:{AV+}m{aä}	NounStem/Singular	;
0:{AV-}n	NounAllomorph/PartitiveTA	;
0:{AV-}n	NounAllomorph/GenitiveTEN	;
0:{AV+}m	NounAllomorph/PartitiveIA	;
0:{AV+}m	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIEN	;
0:{AV+}m	NounAllomorph/IllativeIIN	;
0:{AV+}m	NounStem/Plural	;

LEXICON kotus_35_NOUN/stemfiller
0:{AV-}n	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:{AV+}m{aä}	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIN	;
0:{AV+}m{aä}	NounAllomorph/IllativeVN	;
0:{AV+}m{aä}	NounStem/Singular	;
0:{AV-}n	NounAllomorph/PartitiveTA	;
0:{AV+}m	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIEN	;
0:{AV+}m	NounAllomorph/IllativeIIN	;
0:{AV+}m	NounAllomorph/PartitiveIA	;
0:{AV+}m	NounStem/Plural	;

LEXICON kotus_36_NOUN/stemfiller
0:n	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:m{p~~}{aä}{H}	NounAllomorph/IllativeVN	;
0:m{p~~}{aä}{H}	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIN	;
[STY=NONSTANDARD]:m{p~~}{aä}{H}	NounAllomorph/PartitiveA	;
0:m{p~~}{aä}{H}	NounStem/Singular	;
0:n	NounAllomorph/PartitiveTA	;
0:n	NounAllomorph/GenitiveTEN	;
0:m{p~~}{H}	NounAllomorph/PartitiveIA	;
0:m{p~~}{H}	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIEN	;
0:m{p~~}{H}	NounAllomorph/IllativeIIN	;
0:m{p~~}{H}	NounStem/Plural	;

LEXICON kotus_37_NOUN/stemfiller
0:n	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:m{p~~}{aä}{H}	NounAllomorph/IllativeVN	;
0:m{p~~}{aä}{H}	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIN	;
0:m{p~~}{aä}{H}	NounAllomorph/PartitiveA	;
0:m{p~~}{aä}{H}	NounStem/Singular	;
0:n	NounAllomorph/PartitiveTA	;
0:n	NounAllomorph/GenitiveTEN	;
0:m{p~~}{H}	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIEN	;
0:m{p~~}{H}	NounAllomorph/PartitiveIA	;
0:m{p~~}{H}	NounAllomorph/IllativeIIN	;
0:m{p~~}{H}	NounStem/Plural	;

LEXICON kotus_38_NOUN/stemfiller
@P.NEED.REST@:@P.NEED.REST@nen	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:se	NounAllomorph/IllativeVN	;
0:se	NounStem/Singular	;
0:s	NounAllomorph/PartitiveTA	;
0:s	NounAllomorph/GenitiveTEN	;
0:s	NounAllomorph/PartitiveIA	;
0:s	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIEN	;
0:s	NounAllomorph/IllativeIIN	;
0:s	NounStem/Plural	;
[COMPOUND_FORM=S]:s	Compounding		;

LEXICON kotus_39_NOUN/stemfiller
0:s	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:kse	NounAllomorph/IllativeVN	;
0:kse	NounStem/Singular	;
0:s	NounAllomorph/PartitiveTA	;
0:s	NounAllomorph/GenitiveTEN	;
0:ks	NounAllomorph/PartitiveIA	;
0:ks	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIEN	;
0:ks	NounAllomorph/IllativeIIN	;
0:ks	NounStem/Plural	;

LEXICON kotus_40_NOUN/stemfiller
0:s	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:{t~~}e{F}	NounAllomorph/IllativeVN	;
0:{t~~}e{F}	NounStem/Singular	;
0:t	NounAllomorph/PartitiveTA	;
0:ks	NounAllomorph/PartitiveIA	;
0:ks	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIEN	;
0:ks	NounAllomorph/IllativeIIN	;
0:ks	NounStem/Plural	;

LEXICON kotus_41_NOUN/stemfiller
0:{AV-}s	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:{AV+}{aeiouyäö}	NounAllomorph/IllativeSEEN	;
0:{AV+}{aeiouyäö}	NounStem/Singular	;
0:{AV-}s	NounAllomorph/PartitiveTA	;
0:{AV+}	NounAllomorph/PartitiveITA	;
0:{AV+}	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIDEN	;
0:{AV+}	NounAllomorph/GenitiveITTEN	;
0:{AV+}	NounAllomorph/IllativeISIIN	;
0:{AV+}	NounAllomorph/IllativeIHIN	;
0:{AV+}	NounStem/Plural	;

LEXICON kotus_42_NOUN/stemfiller
0:s	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:he	NounAllomorph/IllativeVN	;
0:he	NounStem/Singular	;
0:s	NounAllomorph/PartitiveTA	;
0:s	NounAllomorph/GenitiveTEN	;
0:h	NounAllomorph/PartitiveIA	;
0:h	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIEN	;
0:h	NounAllomorph/IllativeIIN	;
0:h	NounStem/Plural	;

LEXICON kotus_43_NOUN/stemfiller
0:t	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:e	NounAllomorph/IllativeVN	;
0:e	NounStem/Singular	;
0:t	NounAllomorph/PartitiveTA	;
	NounAllomorph/PartitiveITA	;
	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIDEN	;
	NounAllomorph/GenitiveITTEN	;
	NounAllomorph/IllativeISIIN	;
	NounAllomorph/IllativeIHIN	;
	NounStem/Plural	;

LEXICON kotus_44_NOUN/stemfiller
0:t	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:{aeiouyäö}	NounAllomorph/IllativeSEEN	;
0:{aeiouyäö}	NounStem/Singular	;
0:t	NounAllomorph/PartitiveTA	;
	NounAllomorph/PartitiveITA	;
	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIDEN	;
	NounAllomorph/GenitiveITTEN	;
	NounAllomorph/IllativeISIIN	;
	NounAllomorph/IllativeIHIN	;
	NounStem/Plural	;

LEXICON kotus_45_NOUN/stemfiller
0:s	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:n{t~~}e{J}	NounAllomorph/IllativeVN	;
0:n{t~~}e{J}	NounStem/Singular	;
0:t	NounAllomorph/PartitiveTA	;
0:ns	NounAllomorph/PartitiveIA	;
0:ns	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIEN	;
0:ns	NounAllomorph/IllativeIIN	;
0:ns	NounStem/Plural	;

LEXICON kotus_46_NOUN/stemfiller
0:t	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:n{t~~}e{J}	NounAllomorph/IllativeVN	;
0:n{t~~}e{J}	NounStem/Singular	;
0:t	NounAllomorph/PartitiveTA	;
0:n	NounAllomorph/GenitiveTEN	;
0:ns	NounAllomorph/PartitiveIA	;
0:ns	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIEN	;
0:ns	NounAllomorph/IllativeIIN	;
0:ns	NounStem/Plural	;

LEXICON kotus_47_NOUN/stemfiller
0:{uy}t	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:ee	NounAllomorph/IllativeSEEN	;
0:ee	NounStem/Singular	;
0:{uy}t	NounAllomorph/PartitiveTA	;
0:e	NounAllomorph/PartitiveITA	;
0:e	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIDEN	;
0:e	NounAllomorph/GenitiveITTEN	;
0:e	NounAllomorph/IllativeISIIN	;
0:e	NounAllomorph/IllativeIHIN	;
0:e	NounStem/Plural	;

LEXICON kotus_48_NOUN/stemfiller
0:{AV-}	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:{AV+}{aeiouyäö}	NounAllomorph/IllativeSEEN	;
0:{AV+}{aeiouyäö}	NounStem/Singular	;
0:{AV-}t	NounAllomorph/PartitiveTA	;
0:{AV+}	NounAllomorph/PartitiveITA	;
0:{AV+}	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIDEN	;
0:{AV+}	NounAllomorph/GenitiveITTEN	;
0:{AV+}	NounAllomorph/IllativeISIIN	;
0:{AV+}	NounAllomorph/IllativeIHIN	;
0:{AV+}	NounStem/Plural	;

LEXICON kotus_49_NOUN/stemfiller
0:{AV-}	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:{AV+}e	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:{AV+}e	NounAllomorph/IllativeVN	;
0:{AV+}e	NounStem/Singular	;
0:{AV+}ee	NounAllomorph/IllativeSEEN	;
0:{AV+}ee	NounStem/Singular	;
0:{AV-}	NounAllomorph/PartitiveTA	;
0:{AV-}	NounAllomorph/GenitiveTEN	;
0:{AV+}et	NounAllomorph/PartitiveTA	;
0:{AV+}	NounAllomorph/PartitiveIA	;
0:{AV+}	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIEN	;
0:{AV+}	NounAllomorph/IllativeIIN	;
0:{AV+}	NounStem/Plural	;
0:{AV+}e	NounAllomorph/PartitiveITA	;
0:{AV+}e	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIDEN	;
0:{AV+}e	NounAllomorph/GenitiveITTEN	;
0:{AV+}e	NounAllomorph/IllativeIHIN	;
0:{AV+}e	NounAllomorph/IllativeISIIN	;
0:{AV+}e	NounStem/Plural	;

LEXICON kotus_49e_NOUN/stemfiller
0:{AV-}	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:{AV+}e	NounStem/Singular	;
0:{AV+}e	NounAllomorph/IllativeSEEN	;
0:{AV+}t	NounAllomorph/PartitiveTA	;
0:{AV+}	NounStem/Plural	;
0:{AV+}e	NounAllomorph/PartitiveITA	;
0:{AV+}e	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIDEN	;
0:{AV+}e	NounAllomorph/GenitiveITTEN	;
0:{AV+}e	NounAllomorph/IllativeIHIN	;
0:{AV+}e	NounAllomorph/IllativeISIIN	;

LEXICON exceptional_7_NOUN/stemfiller
0:i	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:je	NounAllomorph/PartitiveA+Vn	;
0:je	NounAllomorph/IllativeVN	;
0:je	NounStem/Singular	;
	NounAllomorph/PartitiveIA	;
	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIEN	;
	NounAllomorph/IllativeIIN	;
	NounStem/Plural	;

LEXICON exceptional_9_NOUN/stemfiller
0:ika	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:ja	NounStem/Singular/Weak	;
0:ika	NounStem/Singular/Strong	;
0:jo	NounStem/Plural/Weak	;
0:iko	NounStem/Plural/Strong	;
0:ika	NounAllomorph/PartitiveA	;
0:ika	NounAllomorph/IllativeVN	;
0:ika	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIN	;
0:iko	NounAllomorph/PartitiveJA	;
0:iko	NounAllomorph/GenitiveJEN	;
0:iko	NounAllomorph/IllativeIHIN	;

LEXICON kotus_39_NOUN/stub
antikristus'][POS=NOUN][KTN=39]:antikristu	kotus_39_NOUN/stemfiller	;
edellytys'][POS=NOUN][KTN=39]:edellyty	kotus_39_NOUN/stemfiller	;
henkäys'][POS=NOUN][KTN=39]:henkäy	kotus_39_NOUN/stemfiller	;
innostus'][POS=NOUN][KTN=39]:innostu	kotus_39_NOUN/stemfiller	;
jänis'][POS=NOUN][KTN=39]:jäni	kotus_39_NOUN/stemfiller	;
kannas'][POS=NOUN][KTN=39]:kanna	kotus_39_NOUN/stemfiller	;
kertomus'][POS=NOUN][KTN=39]:kertomu	kotus_39_NOUN/stemfiller	;
kirjoitus'][POS=NOUN][KTN=39]:kirjoitu	kotus_39_NOUN/stemfiller	;
kummitus'][POS=NOUN][KTN=39]:kummitu	kotus_39_NOUN/stemfiller	;
lihas'][POS=NOUN][KTN=39]:liha	kotus_39_NOUN/stemfiller	;
lähetys'][POS=NOUN][KTN=39]:lähety	kotus_39_NOUN/stemfiller	;
nimitys'][POS=NOUN][KTN=39]:nimity	kotus_39_NOUN/stemfiller	;
pelastus'][POS=NOUN][KTN=39]:pelastu	kotus_39_NOUN/stemfiller	;
rikos'][POS=NOUN][KTN=39]:riko	kotus_39_NOUN/stemfiller	;
selvitys'][POS=NOUN][KTN=39]:selvity	kotus_39_NOUN/stemfiller	;
tarjous'][POS=NOUN][KTN=39]:tarjou	kotus_39_NOUN/stemfiller	;
vedenpaisumus'][POS=NOUN][KTN=39]:vedenpaisumu	kotus_39_NOUN/stemfiller	;
kurkkutulehdus'][POS=NOUN][KTN=39]:kurkku{#}tulehdu	kotus_39_NOUN/stemfiller	;
LEXICON kotus_48_NOUN/stub
ase'][POS=NOUN][KTN=48]:ase	kotus_48_NOUN/stemfiller	;
hame'][POS=NOUN][KTN=48]:hame	kotus_48_NOUN/stemfiller	;
kaste'][POS=NOUN][KTN=48]:kaste	kotus_48_NOUN/stemfiller	;
koriste'][POS=NOUN][KTN=48]:koriste	kotus_48_NOUN/stemfiller	;
maine'][POS=NOUN][KTN=48]:maine	kotus_48_NOUN/stemfiller	;
perhe'][POS=NOUN][KTN=48]:perhe	kotus_48_NOUN/stemfiller	;
polttoaine'][POS=NOUN][KTN=48]:polttoaine	kotus_48_NOUN/stemfiller	;
purje'][POS=NOUN][KTN=48]:purje	kotus_48_NOUN/stemfiller	;
valhe'][POS=NOUN][KTN=48]:valhe	kotus_48_NOUN/stemfiller	;
viipale'][POS=NOUN][KTN=48]:viipale	kotus_48_NOUN/stemfiller	;
asuinalue'][POS=NOUN][KTN=48]:asuin{#}alue	kotus_48_NOUN/stemfiller	;
kylpyhuone'][POS=NOUN][KTN=48]:kylpy{#}huone	kotus_48_NOUN/stemfiller	;
pesukone'][POS=NOUN][KTN=48]:pesu{#}kone	kotus_48_NOUN/stemfiller	;
kastike'][POS=NOUN][KTN=48][KAV=A]:kastik{k~~}e{A}	kotus_48_NOUN/stemfiller	;
raate'][POS=NOUN][KTN=48][KAV=C]:raat{t~~}e{C}	kotus_48_NOUN/stemfiller	;
verikoe'][POS=NOUN][KTN=48][KAV=D]:veri{#}ko{k~~}e{D}	kotus_48_NOUN/stemfiller	;
vuode'][POS=NOUN][KTN=48][KAV=F]:vuo{t~~}e{F}	kotus_48_NOUN/stemfiller	;
piirre'][POS=NOUN][KTN=48][KAV=K]:piir{t~~}e{K}	kotus_48_NOUN/stemfiller	;
LEXICON Suffixes
iskuinen'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=38]:iskui	kotus_38_NOUN/stemfiller	;
laskuinen'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=38]:laskui	kotus_38_NOUN/stemfiller	;
luokkalainen'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=38]:luokkalai	kotus_38_NOUN/stemfiller	;
nivelinen'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=38]:niveli	kotus_38_NOUN/stemfiller	;
päiväinen'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=38]:päiväi	kotus_38_NOUN/stemfiller	;
rakentaminen'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=38]:rakentami	kotus_38_NOUN/stemfiller	;
sieluinen'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=38]:sielui	kotus_38_NOUN/stemfiller	;
vooninkinen'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=38]:vooninki	kotus_38_NOUN/stemfiller	;
paniaiset'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=38]:paniai@U.PLURALE.TANTUM@	kotus_38_NOUN/stemfiller	;
tekiäiset'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=38]:tekiäi@U.PLURALE.TANTUM@	kotus_38_NOUN/stemfiller	;
eleisyys'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=40]:eleisyy	kotus_40_NOUN/stemfiller	;
hermoisuus'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=40]:hermoisuu	kotus_40_NOUN/stemfiller	;
ikäisyys'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=40]:ikäisyy	kotus_40_NOUN/stemfiller	;
kasvuisuus'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=40]:kasvuisuu	kotus_40_NOUN/stemfiller	;
kielisyys'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=40]:kielisyy	kotus_40_NOUN/stemfiller	;
laatuisuus'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=40]:laatuisuu	kotus_40_NOUN/stemfiller	;
luokkaisuus'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=40]:luokkaisuu	kotus_40_NOUN/stemfiller	;
lähtöisyys'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=40]:lähtöisyy	kotus_40_NOUN/stemfiller	;
myötäisyys'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=40]:myötäisyy	kotus_40_NOUN/stemfiller	;
painotteisuus'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=40]:painotteisuu	kotus_40_NOUN/stemfiller	;
pohjaisuus'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=40]:pohjaisuu	kotus_40_NOUN/stemfiller	;
silmäisyys'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=40]:silmäisyy	kotus_40_NOUN/stemfiller	;
sykkeisyys'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=40]:sykkeisyy	kotus_40_NOUN/stemfiller	;
tulkintaisuus'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=40]:tulkintaisuu	kotus_40_NOUN/stemfiller	;
vaikutteisuus'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=40]:vaikutteisuu	kotus_40_NOUN/stemfiller	;
vikaisuus'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=40]:vikaisuu	kotus_40_NOUN/stemfiller	;
ymmärteisyys'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=40]:ymmärteisyy	kotus_40_NOUN/stemfiller	;
ikäisyys'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=40]:#}ikäisyy	kotus_40_NOUN/stemfiller	;
